Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2105
Arrest of judgment; defect of form insufficient.

No judgment can be arrested for a defect of form.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 494, p. 832;

R.S.1913, § 9135;

C.S.1922, § 10160;

C.S.1929, § 29-2105;

R.S.1943, § 29-2105.

A defendant who pleads not guilty without having raised the question of the lack of or a defective verification waives the defect. State v. Gilman, 181 Neb. 390, 148 N.W.2d 847 (1967).